Arkansas statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 5 Beer and Wine — Manufacture, Sale, and Transportation Generally
3-5-208. Duration of state permits.

(a)

Permits issued under the provisions of §3-5-206 for the privilege of doing business as mentioned in §
3-5-206 shall be for an indeterminate period.

(b)

The permit fees levied by §3-5-205 shall be paid annually as therein provided. So long as the annual permit fees are paid, all permits issued shall remain in full force and effect until revoked or suspended.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 247, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-504.1.

3-5-209. Transfer of permit — Dancing privileges — Inspection fee.

(a)

A person that holds an alcoholic beverage control permit may request that certain special applications be made on the permit as follows:

(1)

A permit holder may request a transfer of location of a permit to a new location subject to any restrictions or qualifications that may apply to the permit;

(2)

A permit holder requesting the addition of dancing of any kind on the permit may request dancing subject to any restrictions that may apply to the permit;

(3)

A permit holder may request a change of trade name for the permitted business subject to any restrictions that apply to the permit;

(4)

A partnership, corporation, or limited liability company may request a change of manager application so that the existing manager of the partnership, corporation, or limited liability company is replaced by a new manager subject to any restrictions that may apply to the permit; and

(5)

An on-premises consumption permittee which has filed an entertainment activity sheet as required by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division rules may file a request for permission to amend the entertainment activity sheet that was filed with the permit, subject to any restrictions or qualifications that apply to the permit.

(b)(1)

The fee for any of the special applications set forth in subsection (a) of this section is fifty dollars ($50.00) for each special application.

(2)

The special application fee is payable at the time the special application is made.

History.

Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 4; Pope's Dig., § 14196; Acts 1953, No. 372, § 1; 1957, No. 375, § 1, as added by 1953, No. 118, § 36(F), as added by 1971, No. 585, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-504; 2009, No. 294, § 14.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment rewrote the section.

3-5-210. Sale or manufacture without state permit unlawful.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, any person that shall brew, manufacture, or sell any liquor as defined by this subchapter without first having secured a permit from the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division authorizing the brewing, manufacturing, or sale of such liquor shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

(b)

Home manufacturers of beer or wine in quantities not to exceed two hundred gallons (200 gals.) per year shall be exempt as provided in §3-5-205(f)(2) and §
3-5-207(b) from the permit requirements for the manufacture of beer and wine and shall not be prosecuted for brewing or manufacturing beer or wine without a permit.

History.

Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 12; Pope's Dig., § 14204; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-513; Acts 1995, No. 1051, § 4; 2001, No. 1813, § 3; 2005, No. 1994, § 372.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment, in (a), inserted “Class B” and deleted “and shall be punished as provided in §3-5-203” from the end.

3-5-211. Local permit required.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, distribute, or manufacture the liquors prescribed in this subchapter without first having made application to and obtained a permit from the county or city where the business is to be conducted, and the authority is herein delegated to the counties and cities.

History.

Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 24; Pope's Dig., § 14216; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-515.

3-5-212. County and municipal retailers' permits.

(a)(1)

Before any person shall be authorized to offer for sale at retail the liquors as prescribed in this subchapter in any county, or if within the incorporated limits of any town or city, then he or she shall apply to and secure a permit or license from the county clerk if outside incorporated limits of a city or town or to the city clerk or town recorder if within the incorporated limits of a city or town, a permit or license.

(2)

The county clerk or city clerk or recorder shall charge for the permit or license a sum not in excess of:

(A)

Fifteen dollars ($15.00) for a retailer whose total gross annual sales do not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000); and

(B)

Twenty dollars ($20.00) for retailers whose total gross annual sales shall not be in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(3)

The city clerk or recorder or county clerk shall be empowered to collect from the retailers an additional five dollars ($5.00) for each one thousand dollars ($1,000) gross annual business in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(b)

The permits to retailers shall not be granted or issued by any city clerk or recorder or any county clerk until the retailer shall exhibit the state permit granted or issued to him or her by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division or the director's agent.

(c)

The state permit shall be prima facie evidence of the retailer's right to apply for and purchase a city or county permit, and it shall be unlawful for any city clerk, recorder, or county clerk to refuse to issue the permit upon proper application by the retailer.

(d)

Whenever it shall appear to the city clerk or recorder or to the county clerk that a retail dealer has secured a permit for fifteen dollars ($15.00) when a larger amount should have been paid therefor, he or she require the payment of the difference or cancel the permit.

(e)

The tax shall be due and payable at each place where the retail dealer carries on business.

(f)

The city clerk or county clerk charged with the duty of collecting the license fees shall notify the director of the identity of retailers failing to comply with the provisions of this section. The director shall then notify wholesale dealers to discontinue sales to delinquent retailers. When the license fee is paid, the appropriate clerk shall notify the director that the retailer has paid the fee. The director shall notify wholesalers to resume sales to the retailers.

(g)

Any wholesaler who continues to sell to a retailer after notification from the director to discontinue sales shall be subject upon conviction to a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History.

Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 25; Pope's Dig., § 14217; Acts 1955, No. 353, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-516.

3-5-213. Cities and towns — Regulation of retailers.

All incorporated cities and towns in the State of Arkansas are authorized to pass proper ordinances governing the issuance and revocation of licenses for the retail sale of the liquors as prescribed in this subchapter, within the corporate limits. Cities and towns may impose additional restrictions, fixing zones and territories and providing hours of opening and closing and such other rules and regulations as will promote public health, morals, and safety which they may by ordinance provide.

History.

Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 27; Pope's Dig., § 14219; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-517.

3-5-214. Oath by applicant for permit — Prohibited interests.

(a)

Before any permit authorized by this subchapter shall be issued and delivered to any applicant therefor, the applicant shall make and subscribe to an oath that:

(1)

He or she will not allow any intoxicating liquor as defined by this subchapter of any kind or character, including beer, wine, and distilled spirits, having an alcoholic content in excess of five percent (5%) by weight to be kept, stored, or secreted in or upon the premises described in the permit; and

(2)

The applicant will not otherwise violate any law of this state or knowingly allow any other person to violate any statute while in or upon the premises.

(b)

No manufacturer, distributor, or wholesale dealer to whom or to which this subchapter applies shall have any direct or indirect interest in the business of any person, firm, or corporation applying for and securing or holding a permit as a retail dealer, or in the furnishings or fixtures used in his or her or its place of business, or any lien thereon.

History.

Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 13; Pope's Dig., § 14205; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-514.

3-5-215. Qualifications of retail permittees.

No permit shall be granted to any permittee by the state or any county or municipality to a person who is not a resident of the State of Arkansas on the date of application.

History.

Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 24; Pope's Dig., § 14216; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-515; Acts 1991, No. 606, § 4.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1991, No. 606, § 11, provided:

“It is the intent of this law to no longer require citizenship of the United States in order for a person to hold certain ABC licenses and to eliminate the requirement that persons be a resident of the State of Arkansas for two (2) years prior to the time that they make application for an ABC license. It is also the intent of this law that persons no longer be required to be registered voters in the county in which the permit is located and it is further intended that a person must either reside in the county where the premises is located or live within twenty-five (25) miles of the address of the permitted outlet. It is also the intent of this legislation that proof of payment of personal property taxes to the individual counties will no longer be required in order for a person to apply for or renew an ABC license. It is the further intent of this law that various application requirements regarding convicted felon status, status as it relates to violation of liquor laws of this state or any other state and revocation of permits shall be made uniform among various permits issued by the ABC Division. Therefore, any laws that may conflict with this act shall be and the same hereby are repealed.”

3-5-216. Warehousing of beer and light wines.

(a)

Light wines or beer upon which the tax prescribed by this subchapter has not been paid may be transported from without this state to a distributor within this state and may be received and kept in storage at a distributor's place of business in this state, upon the execution of such bond as the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division may by rule prescribe.

(b)

The director shall:

(1)

Require the storage of all beer or wine in state-supervised warehouses, designated and licensed by the director before the sale thereof;

(2)

Provide for the supervision, inspection, and collection of the costs thereof of the designated warehouses;

(3)

Declare it to be unlawful to offer for sale any beer or wine not thus warehoused, inspected, and approved; and

(4)

Confiscate and destroy any beer or wine not thus warehoused, inspected, and approved or which in any manner violates any provision of this subchapter.

(c)

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall provide for the collection of all fees and taxes imposed by this subchapter upon beer and wine at designated warehouses as provided for in subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

(d)

All distributors and wholesalers licensed as provided in §3-5-206 shall be given a warehouse permit as provided in this section.

(e)

Every person otherwise qualified and who can furnish proper bond and a suitable warehouse shall be entitled to a license as a wholesale distributor of beer.

History.

Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 7; Pope's Dig., § 14199; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-508; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3309.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in (c).

Cross References.

Possession, transportation, or importation of beer, rules and regulations, §3-7-404(c).

Transportation of untaxed liquor prohibited, §3-3-216.

3-5-217. Transportation of products.

(a)(1)

It shall be lawful to transport the products defined in §3-5-202 if the tax upon the products has been paid.

(2)

It shall be lawful for any brewery in the State of Arkansas to transport and ship beer out of state by common carrier or other appropriate parcel delivery service and for common carriers and other appropriate parcel delivery services to accept beer from Arkansas breweries for delivery outside the State of Arkansas to business entities licensed and qualified in the other states.

(b)

It shall be unlawful to transport into, out of, or within this state any light wines or beer upon which the state tax prescribed by this subchapter has not been paid except:

(1)

Where light wines or beer, having first been ordered by or sold to a distributor within this state, is being shipped in due course of business from a brewer, manufacturer, dealer, or distributor without this state to a bonded distributor within this state; or

(2)

Unless the shipment is in interstate commerce and is passing from a point of origin outside of this state through this state into another state.

(c)

The transportation of such liquor into or within this state in all cases shall be under such rules as may be regularly prescribed.

History.

Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, §§ 1-A, 9; Pope's Dig., §§ 14193, 14201; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-502, 48-510; Acts 1997, No. 1061, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 64.

Publisher's Notes.

This section may be affected by §3-3-216.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (c).

3-5-218. Duplicate bills of lading.

(a)

Every railroad company, express company, air transportation company, motor transportation company, steamboat company, or other transportation companies who shall transport into, wholly within, or out of this state, any light wines or beer, whether brewed or manufactured within this state or without this state, when requested by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall furnish the director a duplicate of the bill of lading covering the receipt for the liquor. This duplicate bill shall show the name of the brewer, manufacturer, or distributor, the name and address of consignor and consignee, the date and place received, and destination and quantity of the liquor received from the manufacturer, brewer, or other consignor for shipment from any point within or without this state to any point within this state.

(b)

Any railroad company, express company, air transportation company, motor transportation company, or steamboat company or other transportation companies failing to comply with the requirements of this subchapter shall forfeit and pay to the State of Arkansas the sum of one hundred dollars ($100) for each and every such failure, to be recovered in any court of competent jurisdiction. The director is authorized and empowered to sue in his or her name on the relation and for the use of the State of Arkansas for such recovery.

History.

Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 18; Pope's Dig., § 14210; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-511.

3-5-219. Records and reports.

(a)

Retail and wholesale dealers in light wines or beer, brewers, manufacturers, and distributors shall keep such records and make such reports with respect to the receipt of and the handling of such liquors as the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division may by regulation prescribe.

(b)

The director shall cause a record to be kept of the names and places of business of persons engaged in the brewing or manufacturing and in the sale of beer.

(c)

He or she shall also cause a record to be kept of all beer brewed or manufactured and sold, and the amount thereof of each brewer or manufacturer, or sold by every dealer other than a brewer or manufacturer and a record of all forfeitures collected and all expenses incurred in the collection thereof.

History.

Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, §§ 8, 21; Pope's Dig., §§ 14200, 14213; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-509, 48-512.

3-5-220. Sale in original, labeled containers.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sell or offer to sell in this state any beer unless the beer shall be sold or offered for sale in the original bottle or original package containing bottles, bearing the original label and the full name of the brewer or manufacturer thereof, both upon the label of the bottle and upon the cap or cork of the bottle. In the case of the sale of beer on draught, the beer shall be drawn from the original container or barrel, having stamped upon the ends thereof the full name of the manufacturer or brewer of the beer therein contained.

History.

Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 20; Pope's Dig., § 14212; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-521.

Cross References.

Labeling of beer involved in fire, wreck, or other casualty, §3-4-104.

3-5-221. Miscellaneous prohibited practices — Penalties.

(a)(1)

Any person being either a retail dealer or who knowingly places in his or her stock, who brings upon his or her premises, who has in his or her possession, or who sells or offers for sale any beer or wine on which the tax provided by law has not been paid, in addition to the other fines, penalties, and forfeitures shall be subject to a penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each package of untaxed liquor so held or offered for sale.

(2)

The penalty shall be in the nature of liquidated damages and may be collected by civil action.

(b)

It shall be unlawful for any brewer or distributor of light wines or beer to manufacture or knowingly bring upon his or her premises and keep thereon any beer or wine of an alcoholic content in excess of five percent (5%) by weight or any distilled spirits of any alcoholic content whatsoever.

(c)

Any person who shall add to or mix with any beer or wine as defined in this subchapter any alcoholic or any other liquid, any alcohol cube or cubes, or any other ingredient or ingredients that will increase or tend to increase the alcoholic content or who shall knowingly offer any such liquor for sale shall be guilty of a violation and shall be fined in any sum not less than one hundred dollars ($100).

(d)(1)

It shall be unlawful for a licensee or for any agent, servant, or employee of a licensee:

(A)(i)

To suffer or permit any dice to be thrown for money or for anything of value or to suffer or permit gambling with cards, dominoes, raffle, or other games of chance or any form of gambling in the place designated by the license or in any booth, room, yard, garden, or other place appurtenant thereto.

(ii)

Forms of gambling under subdivision (d)(1)(A)(i) of this section do not include:

(a)

Charitable bingo and raffles under the Charitable Bingo and Raffles Enabling Act, §23-114-101 et seq.; or

(b)

A lottery under the Arkansas Scholarship Lottery Act, §23-115-101 et seq.;

(B)

To suffer or permit the licensed premises to become disorderly;

(C)

To sell, barter, furnish, or give away to any minor under twenty-one (21) years of age any wine or beer;

(D)

To sell, barter, furnish, or possess in the place designated by the license or in any booth, yard, or garden any alcoholic liquors or beverages containing in excess of five percent (5%) of alcohol by weight or to permit any such acts to be done;

(E)

To permit any immoral or lascivious conduct on the part of the patrons or others at or in the licensed premises or in any place appurtenant thereto; or

(F)

To suffer or permit the use of any profane, violent, abusive, or vulgar language at or in such licensed premises or in any place appurtenant thereto.

(2)

The acts and conduct of the agents, servants, and employees of a licensee in the conduct of the business shall be deemed the acts and conduct of the licensee.

(3)

Any violation of the provisions of this subsection shall constitute a Class A misdemeanor, and each day the offense shall be continued shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, §§ 16, 19, 26; 1937, No. 261, § 1; Pope's Dig., §§ 14208, 14211, 14218; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-522 — 48-524; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 31; 2009, No. 605, § 10; 2009, No. 606, § 10.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” in (c); and substituted “Class A misdemeanor” for “misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than one (1) year in jail” in (d)(3).

The 2009 amendment by identical acts Nos. 605 and 606 inserted (d)(1)(A)(ii), redesignated the remaining text accordingly, and made a related change.

3-5-222. Nudity on premises prohibited — Penalty — Rules.

(a)

No person that has received a permit under any law of the State of Arkansas for the sale or dispensing of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption shall suffer or permit any person to appear on the permitted premises in such manner or attire as to expose to view any portion of the pubic area, anus, vulva, or genitals or any simulation thereof, nor suffer or permit any female to appear on the premises in such manner or attire as to expose to view any portion of her breast below the top of the areola or any simulation thereof.

(b)

Any retail beer permittee violating this section shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

(c)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Board shall promulgate such rules as it deems necessary for the implementation of this section.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 965, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-956, 48-957; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 373; 2019, No. 315, § 65.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1985, No. 965, §§ 1, 2, are also codified as §3-9-101.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “guilty of a Class B misdemeanor” for “subject to the penalties prescribed in §3-5-203” in (b).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (c).

3-5-223. Actions to recover taxes.

(a)

Where the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration finds upon investigation that the state has lost tax on account of the evasion of any provision of law, he or she may bring suit in his or her own name in the proper court for the recovery of such taxes.

(b)

Action shall lie against the person evading the tax and against any person who aided, abetted, or assisted in such evasion.

History.

Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 16; Pope's Dig., § 14208; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-522; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3310.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in (a).

3-5-224. Disposition of funds.

All permits or license fees or taxes, penalties, fines, proceeds of all forfeitures, special inspection fees, and costs received by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration under the provisions of this subchapter shall be general revenues and shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the State Apportionment Fund. The Treasurer of State shall allocate and transfer those revenues to the various State Treasury funds participating in general revenues in the respective proportions to each as provided by and to be used for the respective purposes set forth in the Revenue Stabilization Law, §19-5-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 6, as added by 1953, No. 118, § 32(F); 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 16; Pope's Dig., §§ 14198, 14208; Acts 1957, No. 375, § 1, as added by 1953, No. 118, § 36(F), as added by 1971, No. 585, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-504, 48-505, 48-522; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3311.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Director”.

3-5-225. Additional administrative personnel.

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration and the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division are authorized to employ such additional clerks, inspectors, and assistants as may be necessary for the enforcement of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 22; Pope's Dig., § 14214; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-506; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3312.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Director”.

3-5-226. On-premises sales by brewery.

(a)

The brewery may sell to the consumer at the brewery in lots of fewer than sixteen gallons (16 gals.).

(b)(1)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Board is hereby authorized to promulgate reasonable rules for the on-premises sale with foods and the off-premises package sale, labeling, and identification of beer sold at beer outlets maintained on the premises and operated in connection with a brewery in this state.

(2)

Such rules shall include the following minimum requirements:

(A)

The brewery shall provide tours through its facilities; and

(B)

Only sealed containers may be removed from the brewery premises.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 467, §§ 1, 2; 2019, No. 315, § 66.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b)(1); and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in the introductory language of (b)(2).

3-5-227. Registration of beer kegs for off-premises consumption.

(a)

As used in this section:

(1)

“Beer” means any fermented liquor made from malt or any substitute therefor and having an alcoholic content not in excess of five percent (5%) by weight;

(2)

“Keg” means a vessel which has a liquid capacity of more than five gallons (5 gals.);

(3)

“Malt beverage” means any liquor brewed from the fermented juices of grain and having an alcoholic content of no less than five percent (5%) nor more than twenty-one percent (21%) by weight; and

(4)

“Off-premises” means a place other than the licensed retailer's place of business.

(b)

All retail dealers that sell a keg of beer or malt beverage for off-premises consumption are required to attach an identification label or tag approved by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division to the keg prior to the sale.

(c)(1)

The identification label or tag approved by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall consist of paper within a clear protective coating made of plastic, metal, or another durable material that is not easily damaged or destroyed.

(2)

The paper shall be of a kind to allow the required information to be copied and retained by the retail dealer.

(3)

Identification labels used may contain a nonpermanent adhesive material in order to apply the label directly to an outside surface of a keg at the time of sale.

(4)

Identification tags shall be attached to the kegs at the time of sale with nylon ties or cording, wire ties or other metal attachment devices, or another durable means of tying or attaching the tag to the keg.

(5)

The identification label or tag shall be designed so that when affixed to a keg, the label or tag will not mar or otherwise physically damage the keg.

(6)

The identification label or tag shall include:

(A)

The name and address of the retail dealer;

(B)

The name of the purchaser; and

(C)

An individual identification number assigned by the retail dealer that uniquely identifies the keg.

(7)

Each identification label or tag shall be perforated and of a composition that consistently allows for the full removal of the tag when common external keg cleaning procedures are performed at retail.

(d)(1)

Before the retail sale of a keg of beer or malt beverage for off-premises consumption, the retail dealer shall require the purchaser to sign a statement promulgated by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division attesting under the penalty of perjury:

(A)

To the accuracy of the purchaser's name as shown on the identification label or tag;

(B)

That the purchaser is aware that giving, procuring, or otherwise furnishing an alcoholic beverage to a person under twenty-one (21) years of age is a criminal offense as provided in §§3-3-201 and3-3-202; and

(C)

That the purchaser will not allow any person under twenty-one (21) years of age to consume any of the beer or malt beverage in the keg.

(2)

The retail dealer shall also record the following:

(A)

The name and address of the purchaser;

(B)

The identification card or driver's license number from the purchaser's acceptable documentation of age;

(C)

The amount of the container deposit of not less than seventy-five dollars ($75.00);

(D)

The date and time of the purchase; and

(E)

The keg identification number required under subsection (c) of this section.

(e)(1)

All records and statements required under this section shall be maintained by the retail dealer for a period of ninety (90) days from the date of the return of the keg.

(2)

The records and statements shall remain open to inspection by authorized agents of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division and law enforcement officers during the retail dealer's normal business hours.

(f)(1)

The retail dealer shall notify the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division on forms promulgated by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division within ten (10) days of the forfeiture of a container deposit by a purchaser.

(2)

The notification form shall consist of:

(A)

The name and address of the retail dealer;

(B)

The name and address of the purchaser;

(C)

The retail dealer's beer permit or license number;

(D)

A fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) remitted to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division; and

(E)

A statement indicating the reason for forfeiture of the container deposit by the purchaser, including, but not limited to, the following reasons:

(i)

The keg was not returned;

(ii)

The keg was returned more than one hundred twenty (120) days after purchase;

(iii)

The identification label or tag was removed; or

(iv)

The identification label or tag was damaged.

(3)

Any retail dealer that fails to notify the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division within ten (10) days of the forfeiture of a container deposit by a purchaser is guilty of:

(A)

A violation of this subchapter; and

(B)

A Class B violation, as provided in §3-4-402, against the retailer's permit.

(g)(1)

No person other than the retail dealer, a licensed wholesaler, or an agent of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division may knowingly remove an identification label or tag placed on a keg.

(2)

Any person other than the retail dealer, licensed wholesaler, or an agent of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division that is knowingly in possession of a keg without an identification label or tag or knowingly removes or damages an identification label or tag is guilty of a violation of this subchapter.

(h)(1)

The Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division may promulgate rules and prescribe forms for the proper enforcement of this section, including an approved identification label or tag for use under this section.

(2)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall seek the input of licensed brewers and licensed beer importers in developing the label or tag.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2320, § 1; 2007, No. 254, § 1; 2007, No. 827, § 10; 2009, No. 548, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment by No. 254 substituted “more than five gallons (5 gals.)” for “four gallons (4 gals.) or more” in (a)(2); inserted “approved by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division” in (b) and (c)(1); in (c), substituted “copied and retained by the retail dealer” for “automatically produced in triplicate” in (c)(2), and inserted (c)(7); substituted “deposit of not less than seventy-five dollars ($75.00)” for “deposit and registration” in (d)(2)(C); deleted former (f) and redesignated the following subdivisions accordingly; in present (f), substituted “container deposit” for “registration deposit” in (f)(1), (f)(2)(E), and (f)(3), deleted “and remit the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division's portion of the registration deposit” preceding “on forms” and deleted “under subsection (f) of this section” at the end in (f)(1), substituted “A fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” for “The amount of the deposit being” in (f)(2)(D), and substituted “one hundred twenty (120)” for “ninety (90)” in (f)(2)(E)(ii); in present (h), inserted “including an approved identification label or tag for use under this section” in (h)(1), and rewrote (h)(2); and made related changes.

The 2007 amendment by No. 827 substituted “a criminal offense” for “a misdemeanor” in (d)(1)(B)(i).

The 2009 amendment redesignated (d)(1)(B) as (d)(1)(B) and (C), and made minor stylistic changes.

Subchapter 3

— Beer — Licensing of Retailers

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter contains provisions governing the licensing of retailers of beer. Subchapter 2 of this chapter contains provisions specifically regulating the sale of “beer” and “light wines” as defined therein to include only beer and wine with an alcoholic content not in excess of five percent (5%).

Cross References.

Licenses and permits, removal of disqualification for criminal offenses, §17-1-103.

Permits, on-premises consumption of beer, §3-9-211.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1943, No. 244, § 10: approved Mar. 18, 1943. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas the laws of the State of Arkansas regulating the conduct of businesses engaged in the sale of beer at retail are inadequate and it being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety that the sale of beer at retail be regulated by the law enforcement officers of this state, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this bill shall be in full force and effect immediately from and after its passage.”

Acts 1991, No. 606, § 14: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined that numerous persons who are resident aliens of the United States desire to operate establishments that dispense alcoholic beverages in the State of Arkansas and that the same are presently prohibited from obtaining a license in their name. It is further found and determined that the requirement of United States citizenship in order to maintain these establishments poses a burden upon commerce and restricts the number of persons who are able to contribute to the overall economy of the State of Arkansas. It is further found and determined that numerous national corporations are hindered in their operations in that they cannot have newly transferred managers or other key employees assume positions of responsibility within their local outlets since those persons do not meet the two (2) year residency requirement and that such requirement poses an unreasonable burden on the conduct of business in this state as it relates to alcohol beverage outlets. It is further found that the present process of applying for or renewing ABC licenses by requiring proof of payment of personal property taxes is cumbersome, unnecessary, and has no direct relationship to the operation of the ABC permitted outlet. It is further found and determined that there are presently numerous conflicting requirements which are applied to applicants for various retail licenses issued by the state ABC Division and that it is necessary and proper that such permit requirements be made uniform. That all of the aforementioned encumbrances are a burden on the transaction of commerce in the state and upon the efficient administration of government in the state. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 2009, Nos. 605 and 606, § 27: Mar. 25, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the people of the State of Arkansas overwhelmingly approved the establishment of lotteries at the 2008 General Election; that lotteries will provide funding for scholarships to the citizens of this state; that the failure to immediately implement this act will cause a reduction in lottery proceeds that will harm the educational and economic success of potential students eligible to receive scholarships under the act; and that the state lotteries should be implemented as soon as possible to effectuate the will of the citizens of this state and implement lottery-funded scholarships as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

3-5-301. Subchapter cumulative.

This subchapter shall not be construed to repeal any other laws regulating the sale of beer, but shall be construed as cumulative thereto.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 244, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-536.